dictsource/ar_rules
.group ي
         ي           i
    L30) ي           i:
      F) ي           i.:
     FG) ي           i.:
      ا) ي           j         // ياء بعد ألف
         يّ           i:
         يْ           j
         يِ           ji:
       ْ) ي           j         //ياء بعد سكون
       َ) ي           j         // ياء بعد فتحة
      _) ي           j         // ياء في أول الكلمة
         ي (L01      j         //يا بعدها حروف علة
         ي (_S1      i
         يء          ?         // Carried Hamza
         يات (_S3    i:j'a:t   //يّة النسبة في جمع المؤنث جزائريات
         ية (_S2     'ij:ah    //يّة النسبة
         ين (_S2     'i:na     //جمع مذكر سالم منصوب أو مجرور
         يون (_S3    i:j'u:n   //kجمع مذكر سالم منسوب جزائريون
         يين (_S3    i:j'i:n   //kجمع مذكر سالم منسوب جزائريين

.group ى                      //ألف مقصورة
         ى           a
    L30) ى (_        a:
      F) ى (_        a.:
     FG) ى (_        a.:
         ىّ           a:
         ىْ           a

.group ء
         ء           ?
         ء (ً         ?an

.group ئ
         ئ           ?         // Carried Hamza

.group ؤ
         ؤ           ?         // Carried Hamza

.group ة
         ة           t
         ة (_        t
         ةّ           t:
         ةْ           t
         ةً           tan

// Other diacritics
.group
          َ           a   // fatha
      F)  َ           a.  // fatha after thick consonant
     FG)  َ           a.  // fatha after thick consonant and shadda
          َ (C_       =a  // fatha in closed syllable
      F)  َ (C_       =a.
     FG)  َ (C_       =a.
          َ (CC_      =a
      F)  َ (CC_      =a.
     FG)  َ (CC_      =a.
      C)  ٓ           ?   // madda after consonant
          ِ           i   // kasra
      F)  ِ           i.  // kasra after thick consonant
     FG)  ِ           i.  // kasra after thick consonant and shadda
          ِ (C_       =i  // kasra in closed syllable
      F)  ِ (C_       =i.
     FG)  ِ (C_       =i.
          ِ (CC_      =i
      F)  ِ (CC_      =i.
     FG)  ِ (CC_      =i.
          ٍ (_S1      in  // kasratan at the end of word
          ٌ (_S1      un  // dammatan at the end of word
          ُ           u   // damma
      F)  ُ           u.  // damma after thick consonant
     FG)  ُ           u.  // damma after thick consonant and shadda
          ُ (C_       =u  // damma in closed syllable
      F)  ُ (C_       =u.
     FG)  ُ (C_       =u.
          ُ (CC_      =u
      F)  ُ (CC_      =u.
     FG)  ُ (CC_      =u.
          ٰ           a:  // superscript alef
      F)  ٰ           a.: // superscript alef after thick consonant
     FG)  ٰ           a.: // superscript alef after thick consonant and shadda
          َا          a:  // fatha+alef
      F)  َا          a.: // fatha+alef after thick consonant
     FG)  َا          a.: // fatha+alef after thick consonant and shadda
          ًا (_S2     an  // fathatan+alef at the end of word
      F)  ًا (_S2     a.n // fathatan+alef at the end of word after thick consonant
          َو          au  // fatha+waw
      F)  َو          a.u. // fatha+waw after thick consonant
     FG)  َو          a.u. // fatha+waw after thick consonant and shadda
          ِو          iw  // kasra+waw
      F)  ِو          i.w // kasra+waw after thick consonant
     FG)  ِو          i.w // kasra+waw after thick consonant and shadda
          ُو          u:  // damma+waw
      F)  ُو          u.: // damma+waw after thick consonant
     FG)  ُو          u.: // damma+waw after thick consonant and shadda
          َى          a:  // fatha+alef maksura
      F)  َى          a.: // fatha+alef maksura after thick consonant
     FG)  َى          a.: // fatha+alef maksura after thick consonant and shadda
          َي          ai  // fatha+yeh
      F)  َي          a.i. // fatha+yeh after thick consonant
     FG)  َي          a.i. // fatha+yeh after thick consonant and shadda
          ِي          i:  // kasra+yeh
      F)  ِي          i.: // kasra+yeh after thick consonant
     FG)  ِي          i.: // kasra+yeh after thick consonant and shadda
          ُي          ui  // damma+yeh
      F)  ُي          u.i. // damma+yeh after thick consonant
     FG)  ُي          u.i. // damma+yeh after thick consonant and shadda
          ّ           :   // shadda

// Following are default rules for other diacritics and they are just silence.
// Diacritics should be consumed together with leading letters in rules above.

         ٱ  // alef wasla
          ٌ  // dammatan
          ً  // fathatan
          ٍ  // kasratan
         ـ  // tatweel
          ۡ  // small high dotless head of khan
          ْ  // sukun

// non-ascii characters with specified pronunciations
// List the accented characters in en_list with the $accent attribute
